src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-koummsab_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - kõõumâs e-stem kylmempi: # Adjective - full paradigm
     kõõumâs+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: kõummsab
     kõõumâs+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: kõummsab
     kõõumâs+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: kõummsab
     kõõumâs+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: [kõummsõʹbbe, kõummsuʹbbe]
     kõõumâs+A+Comp+Sg+Loc: [kõummsõbâst, kõummsubust]
     kõõumâs+A+Comp+Sg+Com: [kõummsõbin, kõummsubuin]
     kõõumâs+A+Comp+Ess: [kõummsõbân, kõummsubun]
     kõõumâs+A+Comp+Par: [kõummsõbâd, kõummsubud]
     kõõumâs+A+Comp+Sg+Abe: [kõummsabtaa, kõummsabtää]
     kõõumâs+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: kõummsab
     kõõumâs+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: [kõummsõbi, kõummsubui]
     kõõumâs+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [kõummsõbid, kõummsubuid]
     kõõumâs+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: [kõummsõbid, kõummsubuid]
     kõõumâs+A+Comp+Pl+Loc: [kõummsõbin, kõummsubuin]
     kõõumâs+A+Comp+Pl+Com: [kõummsõbivuiʹm, kõummsubuivuiʹm]
     kõõumâs+A+Comp+Pl+Abe: [kõummsõbitaa, kõummsõbitää, kõummsubuitaa, kõummsubuitää]
